texlive/tex/generic/ruhyphen/ruhyphzn.tex
на2т3н
на1х2
н1б2
н1д2
н2д3б
н2д3к
н2д3л
н2д3м
н2д3н
н2д3р
н2д3ц
н2д3с
нд3ш
8нд.
1не
не4в5ро5
.не3в4
не4в5ск
невы1з2
невы1к2
невы1п2
.невы1т2
.не1д2
не3да
недву1з2
недву1к2
недву1п2
недо1з2
недо1к2
недо1п2
.не1ж2
.не2ж3н
не1з2
неза1з2
неза1к2
неза1п2
неза1с2
.неза1т2
неза5и2
.неис2к5р
.неис5кор
ней2т3ро
не1к2
не1к2то
не2к3д
не2к3с
нена1з2
нена1к2
нена1п2
нена1т2
.нео2б3ъ
.нео3
.не5о4б
не5обес
.нео4б3х
.не5о4вд
.не5о4ве
.не5о4гл
.не5о4гне
.не5о4гол
.не5о4гра
.не5о4дер
.не5о4дет
.не5о4ди
.не5о4дин
.не5о4дио
.не5о4дно
.не5о4добр
.не5о4дол
.не5о4ду
.не5о4жи
.не5о4з
.не5о4кл
.не6о5класс
.не5о4кле
.не5о4клик
.не5о4ко
.не6о5корт
.не5о4кр
.не5о4кс
.не5о4ку
.не5о4мер
.не5о4мол
.не5о4мр
.не5о4мы
.не5о4нов
.не5о4пал
.не5о4пасн
.не5о4пах
.не5о4пек
.не5о4пер
.не5о4печ
.не5о4пил
.не5о4пис
.не5о4пл
.не5о4по
.не5о4пп
.не5о4пр
.не6о5протер
.не5о4пт
.не5о4пуб
.не5о4пус
.не5о4пут
.не5о4пух
.не5о4пуш
.не5о4пущ
.не5о4пыл
.не5о4пытн
.не5о4пь
.не5о4рга
.не5о4рдин
.не5о4ри
.не5о4рош
.не5о4са
.не5о4св
.не5о4се
.не5о4си
.не5о4слаб
.не5о4смотр
.не5о4смы
.не5о4сноват
.не5о4соб
.не5о4соз
.не5о4спори
.не5о4степ
.не5о4стор
.не5о4стри
.не5о4стро
.не5о4стры
.не5о4сту
.не5о4сты
.не5о4суще
.не5о4сч
.не5о4сы
.не5о4ся
.не5о4т
.не5о4фиц
.не5о4форм
.не5о4ха
.не5о4хва
.не5о4хла
.не5о4хму
.не5о4хот
.не5о4хр
.не5о4цени
.не5о4че
.не5о4чер
.не5о4чи
.не5о4щ
.не5он.
.не5она.
.не5оне.
.не5оном.
.не5ону.
не1п2
непо1з2
непо1к2
непо1п2
непре1з2
непре1к2
непре1п2
непри1з2
непри1к2
непри1п2
непро1з2
непро1к2
непро1п2
нера2в3
неро2в3
не1с2
не3с4ти
несо1з2
несо1к2
несо1п2
не1т2
не2т3н
не2т4с
не2т5к
не3т5ся.
.неу4
.неуб3р
не1х2
1ни
.ни8и6
ни6и
ни3зо
ни1к2то
ни4с5тир
ни5он
нк3л
н1к2р
4н5н4
1но
но2м3ног
.но6о5
но2с3к
2нокси
.нр8
1н2рав
8нс.
н3ск
8нск.
8нст.
н3с4тв
н3с4ти
8нт.
2н2т3н
8нтр.
1ну
5ну2к3л
ну3ро
8нф.
н1ф2л
8нц.
1ны
8нь.
1нье.
1ньи.
8ньск.
1нью.
1ньютон
1нья.
1нэ
1ню
1ня
.об3
о5а
оа4том
4о
обе3да
обез5об
.об5ла
.об5лес
.об5лок
о6бн
.об5об
5о6бо5льст
о4борот
об5остр
об6остра
5образн
5образов
5о2братим
5о2братн
5о2б3ре
.об3рос
обще1в2
обще1д2
обще1з2
обще1п2
обще1с2
обще1т2
общеу6
об4щн
5объ3е4м5
о2в3н
о2в3ник
о2в3с4к
ов1ст
о1в2то
.ог3
.одно3
5о2дежд
5о2долев
5о2долен
5о2долет
о5е
о7ев.
о7его.
о7ей.
о7ем.
о7ему.
о5и
ои2мен
о2к5а6ут
7о6кеан
5о4кис
6о5кислот
5о2круж
5о4ксид
5о4ксо
5о4куляр
о3ль6ст
о2м3ног
6о3наль
6о3нар
он4у3ч
о5о2
5о4предел
опро2с3н
5о2п3рятн
орг6а7н6и7зо
5о4рганик
5о4рганиче
5о4рдинар
оре5ол
о4риент
о4рто
5ортогон
5о4с3нов
5о2собл
.ос2т3р
.ос4т3рое
.ос4т3рои
.ос4т3рой
.ос4т3рою
ос4т3ря
о5ст4ряп
5о6твращ
5о6твод
5о6тврат
о2т3мен
ото1б2раж
ото1б2раз
5отрицат
о4т5руб
от5у4ч
5о2т3чет
о5у
оу2беж
5о2хлаж
.ох3ран
5о2ценк
5о2ценоч
5о2цени
о5ы
о5э
о5ю
о5я
1па
5пале6о5
5пале7о6нто
пас2к3в
8п6б8
1пе
пе4в5ни
пе3да
пе4р5вен
перво1з2
перво1к2
перво1п2
перво1с2
перво1т2
.пере1д2
.пере1ж2
пере1з2
пере7й6
пере1к2
пере1п2
пере1с2
пере1т2
пере5у6
пере1х2
пере2д3н
пере3да
пери5од
пе2с3к
5пе2т3р
п1з2
1пи
пи2в3н
пи2с3к
п1к2
8пк.
.пл8
8пл.
1п2лав
1п2лазм
1п2лак
1п2ламе
1п2лан
1п2ласт
1п2лат
1п2лац
1п2лач
5п2ле2в3р
1п2ле2с3к
1п2лел
1п2леме
1п2ленн
1п2лено
1п2лесн
1п2лест
1п2лет
1п2леч
1п2ликат
1п2ликац
1п2лит
1п2ло2ск
п2ло2ш3н
1п2лод
1п2лоз
1п2лом
1п2лот
1п2лощ
1п2луа
1п2лыва
1п2лыве
1п2лыву
1п2лыл
1п2лыть
1п2люе
1п2люн
.пн8
.нп8
.пм8
.мп8
5п2невм
1по
.по3б4
по5борот
.по2д3б
по2д3вал
по2д3вер
по2д3верн
по2д3вига
.по2д3г
.по2д3з
.по2д3к
по2д3лин
.по2д3м
подо5б6ра
по6дотче
.по2д3п
.по2д3р
.по2д3с
.подст6р
.по2д3т
.по2д3ф
.по2д3х
.по2д3ц
.по2д3ч
по3д4линне
по3д4лить
по4д5линнейш
.по2д5ы
.по3д6ыма
подза1п2
.подо1д2
.подо3ж4
.по1ж2
по1з2
по2з3вол
по2з3д
по2з4д3н
поза1к2
поза1с2
по1к2
1п2ол2з3т
поли5о
полу1з2
полу1к2
.полу5о6
полу1п2
полу1с2
полу1т2
полу1х2
по3п4
по4п5к
по1с2
по2с3ле
по3с4лед
по4с5ледей
по3с4т4ро
.по2ст
по3стел
пос3тула
пос3тули
по1т2
по5у4ч
по1х2
4п5п4
.пр8
1п2рав
5прав6о5
п2ражн
1п2раздн
.пра5с4
1п2ре
пре1з2
пре1к2
пре5о2б
пре1п2
пре1с2
5п2ре2с3н
пре2с3с
5п2ре2с3тиж
пре3р4в
1п2ред
пре4д7о6пред
пре4до5твр
пре4дура
1п2реж
1п2рекослов
1п2ремен
1п2рерыв
1п2рестан
1п2ри
при5е2да
при1з2
при1к2
при1льн
при5мен
.при5м
при1п2
при1ра2в3
при1с2
при1т2
при1х2
при2з3м
при2т3ч
при3г4ла
при3зо
.при3л
при3ме
при5о
.приль8
прио2рн
при5у4ч
1п2рич
1п2роб
1п2ров
.про1д2
1п2роду
.про1ж2
про5е2да
1п2роез
1п2роект
1п2ро1з2
1п2ро1к2
1п2ро5кис
1п2ро1л2
1п2ро1ме5жу
1п2ро1п2
1п2ро1с2
1п2роте
1п2ро1х2
1п2ро2к3си
1п2ро2с3т4и
1п2ро2с3т4р
3п2ро2ф5
3п2ро3ф6ан
про3ф6е4сс
про3ф6и
про3ф6орм
пр6о3хлаж
1п2ро3к4лам
1п2ро3с2тор
1п2роизв
3п2ротеи
3п2ротека
3п2рото
протое2
3п2роце4с5с
3п2роч1т2
3п2рочн
1п2рош
про2шл
1п2рощ
1п2руг
1п2руд
пры4ск
1п2рыг
1п2рыж
1п2ряг
1п2ряд
1п2ряж
1п2рям
1п2ряч
п1с2
.пс8
8пс.
псе2в3дов
.псе4в3до
псевдо1з2
псевдо1к2
псевдо1п2
псевдо1с2
псевдо1т2
8пск.
.пск8
8пст.
п1т2
8пт.
.пт8
1пу
.пуг3н
пу4гн
пук3л
пу4ск
пу3чи
пу3чит
.пф8
.пх8
п1х2
.пч8
.пш8
1пы
8пь.
.пь8
пь5е
1пье.
1пь6ем
1пь6ет
1пь6еш
1пьи.
1пью.
пь6ют
пь6ющ
1пья.
1пь6я3н
1пья4н3с
1пэ
1пю
1пя
1ра
ра2в3н
ра2в3не
ра5ве
р6а3диа
5радио7
ра4з3вал
ра2з5о2б
ра3з6о3бье
разо1з2
разо1к2
разо1п2
разо1т2
.ра2з5у4
ра3з6у5м
разу6мн
раз5у4ч
ра4с3
ра2с3клад
ра2с3ход
ра4с5четн
ра5с4е
ра4с7та
расп2
ра2с3шит
4р5а2так
8рбь.
.рв8
1р2вавш
1р2вал
1р2ван
1р2ват
1р2вен
1р2вет
р2в3н
.рд8
8рд.
1ре
ре4в3н
5р2е3да2к3т
5р2е3да2к3ц
5р2е3дач
5р2е3зон
ре3к4лам
ре4сс
.рж8
1р2жав
1ри
р6и3дио
риз6о3б4
ри3мен
ри5он
ри3скоп
3рисова
3рисовк
3рисовы
р1к2
р2к3м
р2к3с
8ркс.
1ро
.ров3
ро2в3н
ро2в3не
6рорганик
6рорганиче
ро2с3т
ро2с3э
.ро2с5ком
ро2с5кош
рос4т3к
ро3стр
р1п2
р2п3к
р1с2
8рс.
8рск.
р2с3н
8рст.
р2т3в
р2т3п
р2т3с
р1т2
.рт8
8рт.
р2т3к
р2т3м
р2т3н
р2тс3м
1р2тут
8р8ть.
1ру
.руг3н
р6у3порн
ру3чит
р1х2
р5ху.
8рчь.
рщ3в2л
р4ч3л
1ры
ры2бь7е
ры2в3н
ры2в3не
8рь.
1рье.
1рьи.
1рью.
1рья.
1рэ
1рю
1ря
ря2ш3л
1са
.сб8
.сбл8
1с2б2л
с2ближ
с2близ
1с2бор
.сбр8
1с2б2р
с2брос
с2брош
1с2быт
.св8
1с2ваив
1с2веж
5свер4х5
свер2к3н
1с2верл
1с2вет
1с2вещ
1с2ви2с3т
1с2вид
3с2винец
3с2винц
.сво6е
1с2вобод
1с2вобож
1с2воени
1с2военн
1с2воено
1с2воил
1с2воим
1с2воит
1с2воиш
1с2вою
1с2вяз
1с2вяща
1с2вящен
.сг8
.сгл8
.сгн8
.сгр8
.сд8
.сдв8
.сдр8
1се
3сей2с3м
се3да
се2р3в
сер6е3дин
1с2жат
1с2жиг
.сж8
.сз8
с1з2
1си
3сиб5
3сиб6е
3сиб6и
3сиб6о
3сиб6у
си2г3н
сим2п3то
си5он
си4с5темо
1ск2
.ск8
8ск.
3с4каб
3с4каз
3с2как
5с4кальз
5с4каляр
3с4каут
.скв8
2с3кв
3с4кверн
3с4к4воз
3с4келет
с5кий.
.скл8
3с2клад
3с4клон
2с2к3м
2с2к3н
3с4кобл
3с2коль
1с2коп
3с4копа.
1с2кор
1с2корб
3с2коч
.скр8
1с2крипт
1с2крипц
3с2куч
.сл8
8сл.
1с2лаб
1с2лав
5с4лавян
3с4ла2в3л
3с4лавс
1с2лал
1с2лать
1с2лед
1с2леж
1с2леп
1с2лив
1с2лов
3с4ло2в3л
1с2лож
1с2лой
1с2лое
1с2лои
1с2лою
1с2лоя
1с2луг
1с2луж
1с2луш
1с2лыв
1с2лыть
1с2лыш
.см8
.смл8
.смр8
1с2матр
1с2меив
1с2мел
1с2мен
1с2мерт
1с2мех
1с2меш
1с2мея
1с2мол
1с2морк
1с2мотр
1с2мысл
.сн8
1с2наб
1с2наст
1с2нащ
2с3ная.
1с2неж
8снк.
1с2нов
2с3ное.
сн2т
2с3ную.
2с3ные.
2с3ным.
2с3ных.
1со
со2в3м
со1з2
со2з3да
со1к2
со1м2нев
со1м2нен
со1м2нит
со1п2
со5пред
со1с2
со2с3к
со2с3н
со1т2
со2т3дн
со2т3кил
со2т3лет
со2т3мил
со2т3н
3соф4т5
со1х2
со2х3н
со2х3ш
.сп8
.спб8
8сп.
8спб.
1с2парив
1с2пас
1с2пек
спеле6о7
1с2пех
.спец5о
1с2пец
1с2пеш
1с2пид
1с2пин
1с2пири
1с2пирт
.спл8
1с2плет
1с2пок
1с2пор
5с4п6о3соб
с6право6ч
1с2пящ
.спр8
сп2ра
сп2ро
1с2прям
спуг3н
1с2путн
8ср.
.ср8
срав2н3
1с2рал
1с2рам
1с2ран
1с2рат
1с2рач
1с2ред.
1сре3да
ср4е3ди
сре3до
сре3ды
сре4д3н
1с2рем
1с2рет
1с2реш
1с2роч
1с2рут
.сс8
с3с2
8сс.
1с2сал.
1с2сать
с4с3б
8сск.
1с2сор
2с3сорн
1с2суд
1с2сым
1с2сыт
1с2сыш
.ст8
8ст.
3с2таб
3с4тав
ста2в3ро
3с4тади
3с4тает
3с4таз
3с4тал
3с4таль
3с4тан
3с4тар
3с4тат
3с4таф
3с4таци6о5
3с4тают
3с4тающ
с2т3в
.ств8
8ств.
ст4вол
ст4вор
сте2к3л
3с4тегн
3с4темо
3с4тенн
3с4теноч
3с4теньг
3с4тепен
3с6тере6о5
3с4тероид
3с4терт
сти2г3н
3с4тиг
3с4тиж
чи2с5тил
1с4тил
3с4тимул
3с4тир
4с5тиру
4с5тиров
с2тл
.стл8
с4т5н
3с4тои
3с2той
3с2токс
3с2тол
стол2к3н
3с2тор.
3с2торн
3с2торож
3с2торон
3с4тоя
2с2тр
8стр.
.стр8
3с4т2раг
3с4т2раги
3с4т2рад
3с4т2раи
3с4т2ракт
3с4т2раль
3с4т2ран
3с4т2раст
3с2т2рат
3с2т2рах
3с4т2раш
3с4т2рев
3с4т2рел
3с4т2рем
3с4т2ресс
3с2т4риж
3с4т4рикт
3с4т4рикц
3с2т2рог
3с4т2рое
3ст2роен
3с4т2рои
3с4т2рой
3с4т2роф
3с4т2роч
3с4т2рою
3с4т2роя
3с4т2руг
3ст2руи
5с4т2рукт
5с4т2рукц
5с4т2рум
3ст2ряп
3ст2рять
сту2п3л
3с4туд
3с2туж
3с4туп
3с4тыва
3с4тыд
3с4тыл
3с4тынет
3с4тыну
8с8ть.
1су
5су4б5
с6у3верен
5с6упе6р5
с6у3пруг
с6у3пруж
су3чи
.сф8
1с2фер
.сх8
.схв8
1с2хем
.схл8
1с2ход
.сц8
1с2цен
2с3цент
2с3ценц
.сч8
3с4част
3с4четн
.сш8
1с2шит
.съ8
5съ6е7д
3съемк
1сы
сы2п3л
8сь.
3сье.
1сэ
1сю
.сюрь5
1ся
1та
т6ампер
5т6аксо5
та2ск
8тв.
.тв8
1т2верд
1т2верж
1т2вор
1те
т6инст
те2м3н
те5оре
те5ори
те5орн
те4с3н
те4с3тв
те2х5об
т1з2
1ти
ти5ол
ти5он
т1к4
.тк8
3т6кан
3т6кнов
.тл8
8тл.
.тм8
8тм.
1т2мен
1то
тол2к3н
то2м3но
т1п2
.тп8
.тпр8
8тр.
.тр8
1т2рав
1т2раг
1т2раив
1т2рак
1т2рал
1т2ран2с3
.тран4с5
1т2ранз
1т2раст
1т2рат
1т2рач
3т4реб
3т4резв
тре2з3ве
1т2рем
3т4реп
3т4ре2с3к
.тре2х3
3т4рещ
1т2риди
1т2риен
1т2рис
1т2рон
1т2роп
1т2рофн
3т4руб
3т4руд
3т4ряс
3т4рях
т1с2
8тс.
8тск.
8тст.
тст4в
2тся.
4т5т4
8тт.
1ту
ту2п3лен
ту2ск3л
2т3ч2
1ты
.ть8
2ть
8ть.
3тье.
3тьи.
.ть8ф2
3тью.
3тья.
1тэ
1тю
1тя
4у
у5а
.уб3
5у2бежд
5у2бивец
5у2биенн
5у2бийст
5у2бийц
у6быва
.ув3
у6важ
у6верен
у2в3с4к
5у4гад
5у4г3лево
5у4г3лер
5у4г3лив
5у4г3лов
5у4гольн
5у6дарен
5у6дарн
5у6даро
у6дач
у4добр
у4довл
у5е
уе2да
у6жели
5у2знав
у5и
5у2клад
5у2краш
у2м3ног
у2м3нож
у5о
5у2порн
5у2поряд
5у4правл
5у2п3руг
уп2т3ва
5у2рет
у2равн
5у2раль
нат6у3ра
у2ровн
у2ровна.
у2ровну.
у2рочн
5у4спее
5у4спев
ус3та
5у4станав
5у4станов
5у4стойч
5у4соб
5у4твержд
у5у
5у2чаем
у2част
у2чи
у3чие.
у3чий.
у3чих.
5у2чтив
у5ы
у5э
у5ю
у5я
у6язв
1фа
фа4р3ва
1фе
.фе5о
ф1з2
1фи
фи5ол
ф1к2
.фл8
1ф2лав
1ф2лаг
1ф2ланг
1ф2лекс
1ф2лект
1ф2лирт
1ф2лор
1ф2лот
1ф2луор
1ф2люс
8фм.
1фо
фольк3
ф1п2
.фр8
1ф2рагм
1ф2раз
1ф2ракт
1ф2ракц
1ф2ранц
1ф2рахт
1ф2рез
1ф2риз
1ф2ронт
1ф2рукт
1ф2рут
ф1с2
8фс.
8фск.
.фт8
ф1т2
ф2т3н
1ф2тонг
1ф2тор
фто6р3уг
1фу
4ф5ф4
ф1х2
1фы
1фье.
1фьи.
1фью.
1фья.
1фэ
1фю
1фя
1ха
8хб.
.хб8
8хв.
.хв8
1х2вал
1х2ват
1х2вач
1х2вост
1хе
х1з2
1хи
х1к2
.хл8
1х2лад
1х2лажд
1х2леб
1х2лоп
1х2лор
1х2ляб
.хм8
.хн8
1хо
3холм
х1п2
.хр8
1х2ран
1х2ребет
1х2рист
1х2ро
8хс.
8хск.
х1с2
х3т2
х4т3м
х4т3н
1ху
худо4ж3н
.хф8
8хф.
4х5х4
1хы
1хэ
1хю
1хя
1ца
.цв8
3ц2вай
3ц2вел
3ц2вес
3ц2вет
3ц2веч
1це
3ц4енн
3ц4ентр
це2п3лен
ц1з2
1ци
1ц2и4к3л
ци5он
ци6олк
ц1к2
1цо
ц1п2
8цс.
8цск.
ц1с2
ц1т2
1цу
ц1х2
4ц5ц4
1цы
цы4п3л
1цэ
2ц5эк
1цю
1ця
1ча
ча4с3т
час4тл
.чв8
1че
че2в3н
чер2к3н
че2с3к
че2ст3в
четыре6х
ч1з2
1чи
5чи4с5т
чис6т3к
ч1к2
.чл8
1ч2лен
1ч2ли
.чм8
1ч2мок
1чо
ч1п2
.чр8
8чс.
8чск.
ч1с2
8чт.
1ч2тен
1ч2тет
1ч2тив
1ч2тит
1ч2то
ч1т2
1чу
.чх8
ч1х2
1чы
8чь.
1чье.
1чьи.
1чью.
1чья.
.чь8
1чэ
1чю
1чя
1ша
ша2г3н
.шв8
5ш2вили.
3ш2выр
1ше
шевель7
шеде4в3р
шепел6я3в
шер2с3т
шерс4т3в
ш1з2
1ши
.шк8
1ш2кал
.шкв8
1ш2кол
1ш2кур
ш1к4
8шл.
3ш4ла.
1ш2лаг
1ш2лак
1ш2лам
1ш2лет
1ш2лейф
1ш2леп
3ш4ли.
3ш4лись.
1ш2лиф
1ш2лих
3шло.
1ш2ло
3ш4лю.
1ш2люз
1ш2люп
1ш2мидт
1ш2мыг
1ш2нек
1ш2неп
1ш2нур
1шо
.шп8
1ш2пак3л
1ш2пар
1ш2пат
1ш2пик
1ш2пион
.шпл8
1ш2пор
.шпр8
ш1п2
.шр8
8шс.
8шск.
ш1с2
8шт.
.шт8
1ш2таб
1ш2тадт
1ш2там
1ш2тат
1ш2тейн
1ш2тек
1ш2тепс
1ш2ток
1ш2топ
1ш2тил
1ш2ти2ф3т
1ш2тор
.штр8
1ш2туд
1ш2тук
1ш2турм
1ш2туч
1ш2тык
1ш2т2р
1шу
шу4с2т3р
ш1х2
.шх8
1шы
8шь.
1шью.
1шэ
1шю
1шя
1ща
1ще
щепо2т3
ще2п3л
ще4ств
1щи
1що
8щс.
8щск.
1щу
1щы
8щь.
1щью.
1щэ
1щю
1щя
8ъ
ъ5а
ъ5е
ъе2м
ъе6д
ъ5и
ъ5о
ъ5у
ъ5ы
ъ5э
ъ5ю
ъ5юнкт
ъ5я
6ы
ы5а
ы2г3н
ы2г3ры
ы5е
ы5и
ыно4с3л
ы5о
ы2ск
ы5у2
ы5ы
ы5э
ы5ю
ы5я
8ь
ь5а2
ь5е
ь5и2
ьи3на
ьи3ну
ьи3нич
ьи3нов
ьи3ной
ьи3чев
ь5о2
ь3с3т2в
ьс4
ь5у2
ь5ы2
ь5э2
ь5я
4э
э5а
5э4в3ри
5э4волюц
э2др
э5е
э5и
э2ко
5э2колог
5э2коном
5э2кст3ра
эк2с1
эк4с3пор
.эк3л
5э2ласт
5э4лек3т2р
5э4лемент
5э4мульс
5э4н5анти6о5
5э4нерг
э5о
эпи3с4тол
э6п6о5к6сид
5э2ритро5
5э2пи
5э2таж
5э2талон
5э2тап
5э2тил
э5у
5э4фир
э5ы
э5э
э5ю
э5я
4ю
ю5а
ю5е
ю5и
ю5о
ю5у
ю5ы
ю5э
ю5я
4я
я5а
я2б3ло
5я2вил
5я2вим
5я3вин
5я2вит
я2в3л
я2г3н
5я2дерн
я5е
5я2зык
5я2зыч
я5и
я5о
я2рь
я2ск
5яс3но
я5у
я5ы
я5э
я5ю
я5я
}
